Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-1,134
Stipends authorized.

Any person who competes in the sport of football for the University of Nebraska-Lincoln may be granted a stipend, the amount of which shall be determined by the university. In addition, the university may in its discretion grant a stipend to persons who compete in sports other than football which participate in Big Ten Conference competition.

Laws 2003, LB 688, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB102, § 1.
For the operative date for this section, see section 85-1,136.